Alaska statutes. Title 26. Military Affairs, Veterans, Disasters, and Aerospace.
Article 2. Military Justice.

Cross references. —

For provision providing that AS

26.05.360

— 25.05.990 “apply to offenses occurring on or after August 7, 2016”, see sec. 11, ch. 55, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2018 changes to this chapter by ch. 85, SLA 2018, see sec. 42, ch. 85, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 26.05.360.
Regulations; adopting military justice procedures and nonjudicial punishment.

The adjutant general shall adopt regulations consistent with this chapter for members of the militia. The regulations must be approved by the governor.

The regulations adopted under this section must

provide for nonjudicial punishment; the regulations for nonjudicial punishment may not provide for confinement or separation from military service;

as the adjutant general and the governor consider practicable, apply the principles of law and the rules of evidence and procedure governing military criminal cases in the courts of the armed forces of the United States, but may not be contrary to or inconsistent with this chapter or the applicable Alaska Rules of Evidence;

include rules of pretrial, trial, and post-trial procedure, including methods of proof, for cases before courts-martial and courts of inquiry.

The regulations adopted under this section are exempt from AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

The legislature may annul regulations adopted under this section by law.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016; am § 9 ch 85 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

26.05.380

; renumbered in 2016.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (b)(1), deleted “or prohibit a member of the militia from declining the imposition of nonjudicial punishment in favor of a court-martial”.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.365.
Statement of policy on military justice.

Courts-martial have primary jurisdiction over offenses under this chapter, except when an act or omission violates both this chapter and local criminal law, foreign or domestic. In that case, a court-martial may be initiated only after a civilian authority has declined to prosecute or dismissed the charge, provided jeopardy has not attached. Jurisdiction over attempted crimes, conspiracy crimes, solicitation, and accessory crimes must be determined by the underlying offense. These jurisdictional requirements do not apply to nonjudicial punishment or administrative action taken by military authorities.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

26.05.400

; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.370.
Persons subject to military courts; jurisdiction.

The code of military justice applies to a member of the militia at all times, except when a member of the militia is

in active federal service under 10 U.S.C. (Armed Forces); or

outside the state and not in active duty status.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.403; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.375.
Jurisdiction to try certain personnel.

A person discharged from the militia of the state who is later charged with having fraudulently obtained a discharge is subject to trial by court-martial on that charge and is, after apprehension, subject to the code of military justice while in custody under the direction of the militia of the state for the trial. Upon conviction of the charge, the person is subject to trial by court-martial for an offense under this chapter that is committed before the fraudulent discharge.

A person who has deserted from the militia of the state may not raise a defense that the person is not subject to jurisdiction under the code of military justice by virtue of a separation from a later period of service.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

26.05.405

; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.380.
Territorial applicability.

The code of military justice applies to a member of the militia accused of or charged with an offense under this chapter that is committed outside the state if the member is in active state service under this chapter and is serving outside the state at the time the offense is committed.

Courts-martial may be convened and held in units of the militia of the state while those units are serving outside the state with the same jurisdiction and powers granted under the code of military justice as if the proceedings were held inside the state. Offenses under this chapter committed by members of the militia outside the state may be tried and punished either inside or outside the state.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.408; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.385.
Judge advocates.

The senior force judge advocate of each force of militia of the state, or the delegate of the senior force judge advocate, shall make frequent inspections in the field in supervision of the administration of military justice in the force.

A convening authority shall communicate directly with the authority’s judge advocates in matters relating to the administration of military justice. The judge advocate of a command is entitled to communicate directly with the judge advocate of a superior or subordinate command or with the state judge advocate.

A person who has acted as member, military judge, trial counsel, defense counsel, or investigating officer, or who has been a witness in a case may not later act as a judge advocate to an authority reviewing the same case.

A person may not serve as a judge advocate under the code of military justice unless the person is a commissioned officer of the organized militia of a state or of an active or reserve component of the armed forces or another uniformed service of the United States, is a member in good standing of the bar of the highest court of a state, and is currently

certified or designated as a judge advocate in the Judge Advocate General’s Corps of the United States Army, Air Force, Navy, or Marine Corps or designated as a law specialist as an officer of the United States Coast Guard, or a reserve component of one of them; or

certified as a nonfederally recognized judge advocate, under the code of military justice, by the senior judge advocate of the commander of the force in the component of the militia of the state of which the accused is a member, as competent to perform the military justice duties required by the code of military justice; if a judge advocate is not available, the certification may be made by the senior judge advocate of the commander of another force in the militia of the state, as the convening authority directs.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

26.05.410

; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.390.
Apprehension.

A member of the militia or a person authorized under 10 U.S.C. 801 - 946 or the code of military justice to apprehend persons subject to the code of military justice, a marshal of a court-martial, and a peace officer or civil officer having authority to apprehend offenders under the laws of the United States or of a state may apprehend a person subject to the code of military justice upon probable cause that an offense under this chapter has been committed and that the person apprehended committed the offense.

Commissioned officers, warrant officers, petty officers, and noncommissioned officers have authority to suppress disorder or mutual combat among members of the militia and to apprehend a person who participates in the disorder or mutual combat.

If an offender is apprehended outside the state, the offender’s return to the area must be in accordance with applicable extradition procedures, if any, or by reciprocal agreement.

A person authorized by this section to apprehend, restrain, or confine persons subject to the code of military justice may not require payment of a fee for apprehending, restraining, or confining a person except as otherwise provided by law.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

26.05.420

; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.395.
Imposition of restraint.

An enlisted member of the militia may be arrested or confined by an oral or written order issued by a commissioned officer or another member of the militia of the state acting at the commissioned officer’s direction. A commanding officer may authorize warrant officers, petty officers, or noncommissioned officers to order enlisted members of the commanding officer’s command or subject to the commanding officer’s authority into arrest or confinement.

A commissioned or warrant officer may be arrested or confined only by a commanding officer who has authority over the commissioned or warrant officer. The commanding officer shall deliver the order orally, in writing, in person, or by another member of the militia. A commanding officer may not delegate the authority granted in this subsection.

A person may not be arrested or confined unless the officer issuing the order for arrest or confinement has probable cause to believe that an offense under this chapter has been committed and that the person has committed the offense.

This section does not limit the authority of persons authorized to apprehend offenders to secure the custody of an alleged offender until proper authority may be notified.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.423; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.400.
Restraint of persons charged with offenses.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, a person charged with an offense under this chapter may be arrested or confined as circumstances may require. A person arrested or confined before trial is entitled to prompt notice of the offense of which the person is accused.

A person subject to the code of military justice who is charged with a minor offense normally tried by a summary court-martial or subject to nonjudicial punishment under the code of military justice may not be placed in confinement.

When a person subject to the code of military justice is placed in confinement before summary court-martial or nonjudicial punishment, the person shall be conditionally released pending disposition of the charges.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

26.05.425

; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.405.
Place of confinement; reports and receiving of prisoners.

A person confined as a prisoner under the code of military justice shall be confined in a civilian or military confinement facility.

Unless otherwise authorized by law, a person authorized to receive a prisoner under (a) of this section may not refuse to receive or keep the prisoner committed to the person’s charge by a commissioned officer of the militia of the state if the officer furnishes the person with a statement signed by the officer identifying the offense for which the prisoner was convicted.

A person authorized to receive a prisoner under (a) of this section shall, within 24 hours after receiving the statement of commitment under (b) of this section, or as soon as the person is relieved from guard, report to the commanding officer of the prisoner the name of the prisoner, the offense for which the prisoner was convicted, and the name of the person who ordered or authorized the commitment.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.428; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.410.
Delivery of offenders to a civil authority.

A person accused of a criminal offense against a civil authority may be delivered, upon request, to a civil authority for trial or confinement.

When a sentence imposed in a court-martial proceeding under the code of military justice is interrupted by the delivery of the offender to a civil authority under this section, and the offender is later convicted and sentenced by the civil authority, competent military authority shall request the civil authority to return the offender to the custody of the military authority for completion of the sentence imposed by court-martial.

The adjutant general, with the approval of the governor, may enter into an agreement with a civil authority to ensure the return of an offender under this section.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

26.05.430

; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.415.
Courts-martial classified.

The military courts for the militia of the state are

a general court-martial, consisting of

a military judge, not fewer than five members, and not fewer than one alternate member; or

only a military judge, if, before the court is assembled, the accused, knowing the identity of the military judge and after consultation with defense counsel, requests orally on the record or in writing a court composed of only a military judge and the military judge approves;

a special court-martial, consisting of

a military judge, not fewer than three members, and not fewer than one alternate member; or

only a military judge, if one has been detailed to the court, and the accused so requests under the conditions prescribed in (1)(B) of this section; and

a summary court-martial, consisting of one commissioned officer.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.433; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.420.
Jurisdiction of courts-martial in general.

Each force of the militia of the state in active military service has court-martial jurisdiction over all members of the militia. The exercise of jurisdiction by one force over personnel of another force must be in accordance with the code of military justice.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

26.05.435

; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.425.
Jurisdiction of a general court-martial.

Subject to AS

26.05.420

, a general court-martial has jurisdiction to try a member of the militia for an offense under this chapter and may impose a punishment not forbidden by the code of military justice.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.438; renumbered in 2016 at which time cross references to other renumbered sections were also corrected.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.430.
Jurisdiction of a special court-martial.

Subject to AS

26.05.420

, a special court-martial has jurisdiction to try a member of the militia for an offense under this chapter and may impose a punishment not forbidden by the code of military justice, other than dishonorable discharge, dismissal, confinement for more than one year, forfeiture of pay exceeding two-thirds pay a month, or forfeiture of pay for more than one year.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

26.05.440

; renumbered in 2016 at which time cross references to other renumbered sections were also corrected.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.435.
Jurisdiction of a summary court-martial.

Subject to AS

26.05.420

, a summary court-martial has jurisdiction to try a member of the militia except officers, cadets, candidates, and midshipmen for an offense under this chapter.

A person over whom a summary court-martial has jurisdiction may not be brought to trial before a summary court-martial if the person objects.

If a person accused of an offense under this chapter objects to a summary court-martial under (b) of this section, the person may be ordered tried by special or general court-martial, as appropriate.

A summary court-martial may, under the limitations as the governor may prescribe, impose a punishment not forbidden by the code of military justice, other than dismissal, dishonorable or bad-conduct discharge, confinement for more than one month, restriction to specified limits for more than two months, or forfeiture of more than two-thirds of one month’s pay.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.443; renumbered in 2016 at which time cross references to other renumbered sections were also corrected.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.440.
Grand jury requirement.

A general court-martial in which the member of the militia is accused of committing an offense that is punishable by confinement of more than one year may not be convened until a grand jury of the state has returned a true bill indicating that there is probable cause to believe that the accused member of the militia committed the offense or offenses at issue.

The general court-martial convening authority shall designate one or more judge advocates to represent the authority at the grand jury, except that, at the request of the adjutant general and with the consent of the attorney general, an attorney from the Department of Law may represent the convening authority at the grand jury.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.444; renumbered in 2016.

Cross references. —

For the effect of this section on Rule 6, Alaska Rules of Criminal Procedure, see sec. 10, ch. 55, SLA 2016 in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.445.
Venue for grand jury and court-martial.

The venue for convening a court-martial, trial, preliminary hearing, and presentation of charges to a state grand jury shall be determined at the discretion of the appropriate court-martial convening authority.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Cross references. —

For the effect of this section on Rule 6, Alaska Rules of Criminal Procedure, see sec. 10, ch. 55, SLA 2016 in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.450.
Who may convene a general court-martial.

A general court-martial may be convened by

the governor;

the adjutant general;

the commanding officer of a force of the militia of the state;

the commanding officer of a division or a separate brigade;

the commanding officer of a separate wing.

If a commanding officer who is authorized to convene a general court-martial is the accuser in a matter, the court hearing the matter shall be convened by superior competent authority.

A superior authority may convene a case if the superior authority considers it desirable.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.446; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.455.
Who may convene a special court-martial.

A special court-martial may be convened by

a person who may convene a general court-martial;

the commanding officer of a garrison, fort, post, camp, station, Air National Guard base, or naval base or station;

the commanding officer of a brigade, regiment, detached battalion, or corresponding unit of the United States Army;

the commanding officer of a wing, group, separate squadron, or corresponding unit of the United States Air Force; or

a commanding officer or officer in charge of any other command when empowered to do so by the adjutant general.

If an officer who is authorized to convene a special court-martial is the accuser in the matter, the court hearing the matter shall be convened by superior competent authority.

A superior authority may convene a case if the superior authority considers it desirable.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.448; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.460.
Who may convene a summary court-martial.

A summary court-martial may be convened by

a person who may convene a general or special court-martial;

the commanding officer of a detached company or other detachment or the commanding officer of a corresponding unit of the United States Army;

the commanding officer of a detached squadron or other detachment or the commanding officer of a corresponding unit of the United States Air Force; or

the commanding officer or officer in charge of any other command when empowered to do so by the adjutant general.

If only one commissioned officer is present with a command or detachment, that officer shall be the summary court-martial of that command or detachment and shall hear and determine all summary court-martial cases. If the officer who is authorized to convene a summary court-martial is the accuser in the matter, the court hearing the matter shall be convened by a superior competent authority, if practicable.

A superior authority may convene a summary court-martial if the superior authority considers it desirable.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

26.05.450

; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.465.
Who may serve on courts-martial.

A commissioned officer of the militia of a state or of an active duty component of the armed forces of the United States is eligible to serve on a general, special, or summary court-martial for the trial of a member of the militia.

A warrant officer of the militia of a state or of an active duty component of the armed forces of the United States is eligible to serve on a general or special court-martial for the trial of any person, other than a commissioned officer.

An enlisted member of the militia of the state who is not a member of the same unit as the accused is eligible to serve on a general or special court-martial for the trial of an enlisted member, but only if the accused has, before the conclusion of a session of the court-martial called by the military judge, personally requested, orally on the record or in writing, that enlisted members serve on the court-martial.

After a request is made under (c) of this section, the accused may not be tried by a general or special court-martial unless enlisted members make up at least one-third of the total membership of the court. If eligible enlisted members are not available because of physical conditions or military exigencies, the court may proceed to try the accused without enlisted members, but the convening authority shall place on the record a detailed written explanation of why eligible enlisted members were not available.

The accused may not be tried by a court-martial that includes a member who is junior in rank or grade to the accused, unless the inclusion cannot be avoided.

When convening a court-martial, the convening authority shall detail the members of the militia of a state or of an active duty component of the armed forces of the United States who are, in the convening authority’s opinion, the best qualified for the duty by reason of age, education, training, experience, length of service, and judicial temperament. A person is not eligible to serve as a member of a general or special court-martial if the person is the accuser, is a witness, or has acted as investigating officer or as counsel in the same case.

Before a court-martial is assembled for the trial of a case, the convening authority may excuse a member of the court from participating in the case. The convening authority may delegate the authority under this subsection to a judge advocate or to a principal assistant.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.452; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.470.
Military judge of a general or special court-martial.

A senior force judge advocate who is in the same force as the accused, or a designee, shall detail a military judge to a general and special court-martial. The military judge shall preside over an open session of the court-martial to which the military judge has been detailed.

A military judge must be

an active or retired commissioned officer of the militia of a state or of an active or reserve component of the armed forces or another uniformed service of the United States;

licensed to practice law in a state or a member of the bar of a federal court for at least five years;

certified as qualified for duty as a military judge by a senior force judge advocate who is in the same force as the accused.

The convening authority or a staff member of the convening authority may not prepare or review a report concerning the effectiveness, fitness, or efficiency of the military judge detailed to the case that relates to performance of duty as a military judge.

A person may not act as military judge in a case if that person is the accuser or a witness or has acted as investigating officer or counsel in the same case.

The military judge of a court-martial may not consult with the members of the court except in the presence of the accused, trial counsel, and defense counsel, or vote with the members of the court-martial.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.453; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.475.
Detail of trial counsel and defense counsel.

For each general and special court-martial, the convening authority shall detail trial counsel, defense counsel, and assistants, as appropriate.

A person who has acted as investigating officer, military judge, witness, or court member in a case may not act as trial counsel, assistant trial counsel, or, unless expressly requested by the accused, defense counsel or assistant or associate defense counsel in the case.

A person who has acted for the prosecution may not act in the same case for the defense. A person who has acted for the defense may not act in the same case for the prosecution.

Trial counsel or defense counsel detailed in a general or special court- martial must be

a judge advocate or, if serving as defense counsel, otherwise certified by the senior force judge advocate; and

admitted to the practice of law in this state or otherwise permitted to appear in an action in the courts of this state.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

26.05.455

; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.480.
Detail or employment of reporters and interpreters.

The convening authority of a general or special court-martial shall detail or employ qualified court reporters, who shall record the proceedings of and testimony taken before that court and may detail or employ interpreters to interpret for the court.

A person may not act as a reporter or interpreter under this section in a case if the person is the accuser, a witness, an investigating officer, counsel for a party, or, if the trial is a rehearing, a member of a prior court-martial in the same case.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.458; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.485.
Absent and additional members.

A member of a general or special court-martial may not be absent or excused after the court has been assembled for the trial of the accused unless the member is excused

as a result of a challenge; or

for good cause by the military judge or by order of the convening authority.

If a general court-martial, other than a general court-martial composed of only a military judge, is reduced below five members, the military judge shall assign an available alternate member to the general court-martial to restore the court to five members. The trial may not proceed if a general court-martial, other than a general court-martial composed of only a military judge, is reduced below five members and no alternate is available for assignment.

If a special court-martial, other than a special court-martial composed of only a military judge, is reduced below three members, the military judge shall assign an alternate member to the special court-martial to restore the court to three members. The trial may not proceed if a special court-martial, other than a special court-martial composed of only a military judge, is reduced below three members and no alternate is available for assignment.

If the military judge of a court-martial composed of only a military judge is unable to proceed with a trial because of a challenge or for other good cause, the senior force judge advocate shall detail a new military judge. The trial shall proceed as if no evidence had previously been introduced, unless a verbatim record of the evidence previously introduced or a written stipulation of the evidence is read in court in the presence of the new military judge, the accused, and counsel for both sides.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

26.05.460

; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.490.
Charges and specifications.

Charges and specifications must be signed by a member of the militia under oath before a commissioned officer authorized by AS

26.05.655

to administer oaths. The charges and specifications must state

that the signer has personal knowledge of, or has investigated, the facts set out in the charges and specifications;

that the charges and specifications are true in fact to the best of the signer’s knowledge and belief.

The person proffering the charges and specifications shall present them to the proper authority. The proper authority receiving the charges and specifications shall immediately determine the disposition of the charges in the interest of justice and discipline, and the person accused shall be informed of the charges as soon as practicable.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.463; renumbered in 2016 at which time cross references to other renumbered sections were also corrected.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.495.
Compulsory self-incrimination prohibited.

A member of the militia may not compel a person to make a self-incriminating statement or to answer a question if the answer may incriminate the person.

A member of the militia may not interrogate or request a statement from a person suspected of an offense under this chapter without first informing the person of the nature of the accusation and advising the person that the person does not have to make any statement regarding the offense of which the person is accused or suspected and that any statement made by the person may be used as evidence against the person in a trial by court-martial.

A member of the militia may not compel a person to make a statement or produce evidence before a military court if the statement or evidence is not material to the issue before the court and may tend to degrade the person.

A statement obtained from a person in violation of this section or through the use of coercion, unlawful influence, or unlawful inducement may not be admitted into evidence against the person in a trial by court-martial.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

26.05.465

; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.